New Jersey, session 222, S2952.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 15 of P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-15) is amended to read as follows: 15. a. Any municipality may by ordinance impose and collect an employer payroll tax for general municipal purposes of the municipality, or for the purposes set forth in subsection d. of this section, at a rate of up to one percent of the employer's payroll.  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a municipality may, by ordinance, elect to retain up to three percent of employer payroll tax collected annually to pay for costs related to the administration of this article (C.40:48C-14 through 40:48C-19). b.    A municipality may by ordinance adjust the rate of an employer payroll tax imposed and collected pursuant to subsection a. of this section, provided that the rate does not exceed one percent.  Any reduction in an employer payroll tax while the municipality is in receipt of aid provided through the Transitional Aid to Localities program, or any other discretionary aid program for municipalities in fiscal distress, shall be subject to approval by the Department of Community Affairs. c.     An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section may provide that the employer payroll tax shall not apply to the remuneration paid by employers to employees who are residents of the municipality. d. (1) If a municipality adopts an ordinance pursuant to subsection a. of this section and the municipality has a median household income of $55,000 or greater according to the most recent American Community Survey five-year estimate by the United States Census Bureau, all employer payroll tax revenues collected by the municipality pursuant to the ordinance shall be deposited into a trust fund to be used exclusively for school purposes, inclusive of charter schools. (2)   The governing body of the municipality shall monthly pay employer payroll tax revenues deposited in the trust fund over to the board secretary or treasurer of school moneys, as appropriate, of the school district coextensive with the municipality or of which the municipality comprises a part, in an amount equal to one-twelfth of the difference in State school aid provided to that school district, pursuant to P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) and P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.), between the current State fiscal year and State fiscal year 2018, for use in lieu of adjustment aid and all other categories of State school aid. (3)   Any balance remaining in the trust fund shall be reserved for use toward making payments pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection in the event the employer payroll tax revenues collected in a year are insufficient to pay the full amount provided for under that paragraph. (cf: P.L.2018, c.68, s.1) 2.  Section 16 of P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-16) is amended to read as follows: 16.  Any ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall: a.     Require each employer to report his payroll for the preceding calendar quarter to an officer of the municipality designated therein to receive the same and to collect the tax together with such other related information as shall be required by the ordinance and regulations issued pursuant thereto; b.    Require the report and payment of the tax imposed for the preceding calendar quarter on or before the last day of April, July, October and January, respectively; c.     Provide methods for enforcement of, and for the imposition of penalties for failure to report and pay, the tax imposed; d.    Provide a procedure for claims for refunds, and repayment of overpayment of taxes; e.     Prohibit any employer from deducting or withholding any amount from remuneration payable to an employee on account of the tax imposed by the ordinance; f.     Provide that information contained in any employer's report or received by the municipality or any of its officers or employees as a result of any investigation, hearing or verification of a report shall be confidential except for official purposes and shall not be disclosed except in accordance with an order of court or as otherwise provided by law. g.    Require certain employers to provide additional information to assist in the administration of the local tax, as requested by the municipality. Any ordinance adopted pursuant to this article (C.40:48C-14 through 40:48C-19) also may require the payment of interest by an employer on delinquent payroll taxes. Payroll taxes shall be considered delinquent when the amount due to the municipality is not paid by the employer on or before the dates specified in subsection b. of this section.  Any ordinance so adopted may fix the rate of interest to be charged on the delinquent payroll taxes; however, the rate so fixed shall not exceed 8% per annum on the first $1,500 of the delinquency and 18% per annum on any amount in excess of $1,500, to be calculated from the date the tax waspayable until the date that actual payment to the municipality is made. (cf: P.L.2007, c.294, s.1) 3.  Section 18 of P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-18) is amended to read as follows: a. No employer shall be obligated to report and pay an employer payroll tax, or any interest, penalty or costs with respect thereto, to more than one municipality with respect to remuneration paid to an employee for services performed.  Where any dispute as to the liability for an employer payroll tax to more than one municipality for services performed by an employee is not resolved by agreement between the employer and the municipalities, all of said municipalities shall be joined in a proceeding in the tax court to collect the tax alleged to be due. b. If an out-of-State municipality or other out-of-State state or out-of-State local entity imposes an employer payroll tax on any employee with respect to remuneration paid to an employee for service performed out-of-State, an employer payroll tax imposed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-15) shall not apply to that employee.  In such case, the employer shall submit documentation in a manner prescribed by Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs regarding the employees residency status, the location and description of services performed out-of-State, and the applicable out-of-State employer payroll tax, to the taxing municipality before any employer payroll tax obligation, imposed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-15), shall be waived. (cf: P.L.1983, c.36, s.4) 4.    R.S.54:50-9 is amended to read as follows: 54:50-9.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent: a.     The delivery to a taxpayer or the taxpayer's duly authorized representative of a copy of any report or any other paper filed by the taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of this subtitle or of any such State tax law; b.    The publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of a particular report and the items thereof; c.     The director, in the director's discretion and subject to reasonable conditions imposed by the director, from disclosing the name and address of any licensee under any State tax law, unless expressly prohibited by such State tax law; d.    The inspection by the Attorney General or other legal representative of this State of the reports or files relating to the claim of any taxpayer who shall bring an action to review or set aside any tax imposed under any State tax law or against whom an action or proceeding has been instituted in accordance with the provisions thereof; e.     The examination of said records and files by the Comptroller, State Auditor or State Commissioner of Finance, or by their respective duly authorized agents; f.     The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of any information contained in tax reports or returns or any audit thereof or the report of any investigation made with respect thereto, filed pursuant to the tax laws, to the taxing officials of any other state, the District of Columbia, the United States and the territories thereof, providing said jurisdictions grant like privileges to this State and providing such information is to be used for tax purposes only; g.    The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of any material information disclosed by the records or files to any law enforcing authority of this State who shall be charged with the investigation or prosecution of any violation of the criminal provisions of this subtitle or of any State tax law; h.    The furnishing by the director to the State agency responsible for administering the Child Support Enforcement program pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, Pub.L.93-647 (42 U.S.C. s.651 et seq.), with the names, home addresses, social security numbers and sources of income and assets of all absent parents who are certified by that agency as being required to pay child support, upon request by the State agency and pursuant to procedures and in a form prescribed by the director; i.     The furnishing by the director to the Board of Public Utilities any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be necessary for the administration of P.L.1991, c.184 (C.54:30A-18.6 et al.) and P.L.1997, c.162 (C.54:10A-5.25 et al.); j.     The furnishing by the director to the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control in the Department of Law and Public Safety any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be relevant, in the discretion of the director, in any proceeding conducted for the issuance, suspension or revocation of any license authorized pursuant to Title 33 of the Revised Statutes; k.    The inspection by the Attorney General or other legal representative of this State of the reports or files of any tobacco product manufacturer, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-2), for any period in which that tobacco product manufacturer was not or is not in compliance with subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-3), or of any licensed distributor as defined in section 102 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-2), for the purpose of facilitating the administration of the provisions of P.L.1999, c.148 (C.52:4D-1 et seq.); l.     The furnishing, at the discretion of the director, of information as to whether a contractor or subcontractor holds a valid business registration as defined in section 1 of P.L.2001, c.134 (C.52:32-44); m.   The furnishing by the director to a State agency as defined in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.158 (C.54:50-24) the names of licensees subject to suspension for non-payment of State tax indebtedness pursuant to P.L.2004, c.58 (C.54:50-26.1 et al.); n.    The release to the United States Department of the Treasury, Bureau of Financial Management Service, or its successor of relevant taxpayer information for purposes of implementing a reciprocal collection and offset of indebtedness agreement entered into between the State of New Jersey and the federal government pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2006, c.32 (C.54:49-12.7); o.    The examination of said records and files by the Commissioner of Health and Senior Services, the Commissioner of Human Services, the Medicaid Inspector General, or their respective duly authorized agents, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2007, c.217 (C.26:2H-18.60e), section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or section 5 of P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-12); p.    The furnishing [at the discretion of the director] of employer-provided wage and tax withholding information contained in tax reports or returns filed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:7-2, 54A:7-4 and 54A:7-7, or such other tax return information as may be necessary, to the designated municipal officer of a municipality authorized to impose an employer payroll tax pursuant to the provisions of Article 5 (Employer Payroll Tax) of the "Local Tax Authorization Act," P.L.1970, c.326 (C.40:48C-14 et seq.), for the following limited [purpose of] purposes: (1) verifying the payroll information reported by employers subject to the employer payroll tax; and (2) identifying each employer in the municipality that is subject to the employer payroll tax, and which did not report payroll information for a preceding calendar quarter; q.    The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development of any information, including, but not limited to, tax information statements, reports, audit files, returns, or reports of any investigation for the purpose of labor market research or assisting in investigations pursuant to any State wage, benefit or tax law as enumerated in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.194 (C.34:1A-1.11); or pursuant to P.L.1940, c.153 (C.34:2-21.1 et seq.). r.     The furnishing by the director to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority any information contained in tax information statements, reports or returns, or any audit thereof or a report of any investigation made with respect thereto, as may be relevant to assist the authority in the implementation of programs through which grants, loans, tax credits, or other forms of financial assistance are provided.  The director shall provide to the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, upon request, such information. s.     The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance of any information, including, but not limited to, tax information statements, reports, audit files, returns, or reports of any investigation for the purpose of assisting in investigations pursuant to any insurance fraud investigation as enumerated in P.L.1983, c.320 (C.17:33A-1 et seq.). t.     The furnishing by the director to the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance or the Commissioner of Human Services of any information contained in tax reports or returns for the purpose of determining a taxpayer's eligibility for insurance affordability assistance, the State Medicaid program, or the NJ FamilyCare Program and to otherwise support minimum essential coverage outreach and enrollment efforts. (cf: P.L.2022, c.39, s.10) 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.